District of Columbia statutes.
44-661.04

Applicability of fees.

(a)

The fee imposed by § 44-661.03 shall not be due and payable until such time that the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves the Medicaid State Plan amendment authorizing the Medicaid payments described in § 44-661.05.

(b)

The fee imposed by § 44-661.03 shall cease to be imposed, and any moneys remaining in the Fund shall be refunded to hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by them, if:

(1)

The Department makes changes in its rules that reduce the hospital inpatient or outpatient Medicaid payment rates, including adjustment to payment rates that are in effect on October 1, 2014; or

(2)

The payments to hospitals required under § 44-661.05 are modified in any way other than to secure federal approval of such payments as described in § 44-661.05 or are not eligible for federal matching funds under section 1903(w) of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (70 Stat. 349; 42 U.S.C. §1396b(w)) (“Social Security Act”).

(c)

The fee imposed by § 44-661.03 shall not take effect or shall cease to be imposed if the fee is determined to be an impermissible tax under section 1903(w)(3)(B) of the Social Security Act by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(d)

Should the fee imposed by § 44-661.03 not take effect or cease to be imposed, moneys in the Fund derived from the imposed fee shall be disbursed in accordance with § 44-661.05 to the extent federal matching is available. If federal matching is not available due to a determination by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the fee is impermissible, any remaining moneys shall be refunded to hospitals in proportion to the amounts paid by them.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5065, 62 DCR 10905